North Carolina statutes. Chapter 37A. Uniform Principal and Income Act.
Part 3. Receipts Normally Apportioned.

§ 37A-4-408.
Insubstantial allocations not required.

If a trustee determines that an allocation between principal and income required by

G.S. 37A-4-409

, 37A-4-410, 37A-4-411, 37A-4-412, or 37A-4-415 is insubstantial, the trustee may allocate the entire amount to principal unless one of the circumstances described in

G.S. 37A-1-104(c)

applies to the allocation. This power may be exercised by a cotrustee in the circumstances described in G.S. 37A-1-104(d) and may be released for the reasons and in the manner described in G.S. 37A-1-104(e). An allocation is presumed to be insubstantial if:

The amount of the allocation would increase or decrease net income in an accounting period, as determined before the allocation, by less than ten percent (10%); or

The value of the asset producing the receipt for which the allocation would be made is less than ten percent (10%) of the total value of the trust’s assets at the beginning of the accounting period.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-4-409.
Deferred compensation, annuities, and similar payments.

In this section:

“Payment” means a payment that a trustee may receive over a fixed number of years or during the life of one or more individuals because of services rendered or property transferred to the payer in exchange for future payments. The term includes a payment made in money or property from the payer’s general assets or from a separate fund created by the payer. For purposes of subsections (d), (d1), (d2), and (d3) of this section, the term also includes any payment from any separate fund, regardless of the reason for the payment.

“Separate fund” includes a private or commercial annuity, an individual retirement account, and a pension, profit sharing, stock-bonus, or stock-ownership plan.

To the extent that a payment is characterized as interest, a dividend, or a payment made in lieu of interest or a dividend, a trustee shall allocate the payment to income. The trustee shall allocate to principal the balance of the payment and any other payment received in the same accounting period that is not characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment.

If no part of a payment is characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment, and all or part of the payment is required to be made, a trustee shall allocate to income ten percent (10%) of the part that is required to be made during the accounting period and the balance to principal. If no part of a payment is required to be made or the payment received is the entire amount to which the trustee is entitled, the trustee shall allocate the entire payment to principal. For purposes of this subsection, a payment is not “required to be made” to the extent that it is made because the trustee exercises a right of withdrawal.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d1) of this section, subsections (d2) and (d3) of this section apply, and subsections (b) and (c) of this section do not apply in determining the allocation of a payment from a separate fund to:

A trust to which an election to qualify for a marital deduction under section 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code has been made, or

A trust that qualifies for the marital deduction under section 2056(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d1)

Subsections (d), (d2), and (d3) of this section do not apply if and to the extent that the series of payments would, without the application of subsection (d) of this section, qualify for the marital deduction under section 2056(b)(7)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d2)

A trustee shall determine the internal income of each separate fund for the accounting period as if the separate fund were a trust subject to this section. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall demand that the person administering the separate fund distribute the internal income to the trust. The trustee shall allocate a payment from the separate fund to income to the extent of the internal income of the separate fund and distribute that amount to the surviving spouse. The trustee shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall allocate principal to income to the extent that the internal income of the separate fund exceeds payments made from the separate fund to the trust during the accounting period.

(d3)

If a trustee cannot determine the internal income of a separate fund but can determine the value of the separate fund, the internal income of the separate fund is deemed to equal four percent (4%) of the fund’s value, according to the most recent statement of value preceding the beginning of the accounting period. If the trustee can determine neither the internal income of the separate fund nor the fund’s value, the internal income of the fund is deemed to equal the product of the interest rate and the present value of the expected future payments, as determined under section 7520 of the Internal Revenue Code for the month preceding the accounting period for which the computation is made.

This section does not apply to payments to which

G.S. 37A-4-410

applies.

History.

2003-232, s. 2; 2010-181, s. 3.

§ 37A-4-410.
Liquidating asset.

In this section, “liquidating asset” means an asset whose value will diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a period of limited duration. The term includes a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the unpaid balance. The term does not include a payment subject to

G.S. 37A-4-409

, resources subject to

G.S. 37A-4-411

, timber subject to

G.S. 37A-4-412

, an activity subject to

G.S. 37A-4-414

, an asset subject to

G.S. 37A-4-415

, or any asset for which the trustee establishes a reserve for depreciation under

G.S. 37A-5-503

.

A trustee shall allocate to income ten percent (10%) of the receipts from a liquidating asset and the balance to principal.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-4-411.
Minerals, water, and other natural resources.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from an interest in minerals or other natural resources under this section, the trustee shall allocate them as follows:

If received as nominal delay rental or nominal annual rent on a lease, a receipt shall be allocated to income.

If received from a production payment, a receipt shall be allocated to income if and to the extent that the agreement creating the production payment provides a factor for interest or its equivalent. The balance shall be allocated to principal.

If an amount received as a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, bonus, or delay rental is more than nominal, ninety percent (90%) shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

If an amount is received from a working interest or any other interest not provided for in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, ninety percent (90%) of the net amount received shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

An amount received on account of an interest in water that is renewable shall be allocated to income. If the water is not renewable, ninety percent (90%) of the amount shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

This Chapter applies whether or not a decedent or donor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before the interest became subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources on January 1, 2004, the trustee may allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this Chapter or in the manner used by the trustee before January 1, 2004. If the trust acquires an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources after January 1, 2004, the trustee shall allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this Chapter.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-4-412.
Timber.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from the sale of timber and related products pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate the net receipts:

To income to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land does not exceed the rate of growth of the timber during the accounting periods in which a beneficiary has a mandatory income interest;

To principal to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land exceeds the rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;

To or between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of timberland or from a contract to cut timber from land owned by a trust, by determining the amount of timber removed from the land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection; or

To principal to the extent that advance payments, bonuses, and other payments are not allocated pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.

In determining net receipts to be allocated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, a trustee shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.

This Chapter applies whether or not a decedent or transferor was harvesting timber from the property before it becomes subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in timberland on January 1, 2004, the trustee may allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this Chapter or in the manner used by the trustee before January 1, 2004. If the trust acquires an interest in timberland after January 1, 2004, the trustee shall allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this Chapter.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-4-413.
Property not productive of income.

If a marital deduction is allowed for all or part of a trust whose assets consist substantially of property that does not provide the spouse with sufficient income from or use of the trust assets, and if the amounts that the trustee transfers from principal to income under

G.S. 37A-1-104

and distributes to the spouse from principal under the terms of the trust are insufficient to provide the spouse with the beneficial enjoyment required to obtain the marital deduction, the spouse may require the trustee to make property productive of income, convert property within a reasonable time, or exercise the power conferred by

G.S. 37A-1-104

(a). The trustee may decide which action or combination of actions to take.

In cases not governed by subsection (a) of this section, proceeds from the sale or other disposition of an asset are principal without regard to the amount of income the asset produces during any accounting period.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-4-414.
Derivatives and options.

In this section, “derivative” means a contract or financial instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments that gives a trust the right or obligation to participate in some or all changes in the price of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets or changes in a rate, an index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset or a group of assets.

To the extent that a trustee does not account under

G.S. 37A-4-403

for transactions in derivatives, the trustee shall allocate to principal receipts from and disbursements made in connection with those transactions.

If a trustee grants an option to buy property from the trust, whether or not the trust owns the property when the option is granted, grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the trust, or acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an asset owned by the trust, and the trustee or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the option is exercised, an amount received for granting the option shall be allocated to principal. An amount paid to acquire the option shall be paid from principal. A gain or loss realized upon the exercise of an option, including an option granted to a settlor of the trust for services rendered, shall be allocated to principal.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.

§ 37A-4-415.
Asset-backed securities.

In this section, “asset-backed security” means an asset whose value is based upon the right it gives the owner to receive distributions from the proceeds of financial assets that provide collateral for the security. The term includes an asset that gives the owner the right to receive from the collateral financial assets only the interest or other current return or only the proceeds other than interest or current return. The term does not include an asset to which

G.S. 37A-4-401

or

G.S. 37A-4-409

applies.

If a trust receives a payment from interest or other current return and from other proceeds of the collateral financial assets, the trustee shall allocate to income the portion of the payment the payer identifies as being from interest or other current return and shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal.

If a trust receives one or more payments in exchange for the trust’s entire interest in an asset-backed security in one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate the payments to principal. If a payment is one of a series of payments that will result in the liquidation of the trust’s interest in the security over more than one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate ten percent (10%) of the payment to income and the balance to principal.

History.

2003-232, s. 2.